North Carolina statutes. Chapter 89C. Engineering and Land Surveying.
§ 89C-25.
Limitations on application of Chapter.

This Chapter shall not prevent the following activities:

The practice of architecture as defined in Chapter 83A of the General Statutes, landscape architecture as defined in Chapter 89A of the General Statutes, or contracting as defined in Articles 1, 2, 4, and 5 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-304, s. 7, effective June 26, 2011.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-304, s. 7, effective June 26, 2011.

Engaging in engineering or land surveying as an employee or assistant under the responsible charge of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor.

The practice of professional engineering or land surveying by any person not a resident of, and having no established place of business in this State, as a consulting associate of a professional engineer or professional land surveyor licensed under the provisions of this Chapter; provided, the nonresident is qualified for performing the professional service in the person’s own state or country.

Practice by members of the Armed Forces of the United States; employees of the government of the United States while engaged in the practice of engineering or land surveying solely for the government on government-owned works and projects; or practice by those employees of the Natural Resources Conservation Service, county employees, employees of the Soil and Water Conservation Districts, or employees of the Division of Soil and Water Conservation of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services who have engineering job approval authority issued by the Natural Resources Conservation Service or the Soil and Water Conservation Commission that involves the planning, designing, or implementation of best management practices on agricultural lands, or for the planning, designing, or implementation of best management practices approved for cost-share funding pursuant to programs identified in G.S. 139-4(d)(9).

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-120, s. 11(a), effective September 18, 2014.

(7a)

The engineering or surveying activities of a person as defined by

G.S. 89C-3(5)

who is engaged in manufacturing, processing, producing, or transmitting and delivering a product or public utility service, and which activities are reasonably necessary and connected with the primary services performed by individuals regularly employed in the ordinary course of business by the person, provided that the engineering or surveying activity is not a holding out or an offer to the public of engineering or surveying services, as prohibited by this Chapter. The engineering and surveying services may not be offered, performed, or rendered independently from the primary services rendered by the person. For purposes of this subdivision, “activities reasonably necessary and connected with the primary service” include the following:

Installation or servicing of the person’s product or public utility service by employees of the person conducted outside the premises of the person’s business.

Design, acquisition, installation, or maintenance of machinery, equipment, or apparatus incidental to the manufacture or installation of the product or public utility service performed by employees of the person upon property owned, leased, or used by the person.

Research and development performed in connection with the manufacturing, processing, or production of the person’s product or public utility service by employees of the person.

Engineering or surveying activities performed pursuant to this subdivision, where the safety of the public is directly involved, shall be under the responsible charge of a licensed professional engineer or licensed professional surveyor.

The (i) preparation of fire sprinkler planning and design drawings by a fire sprinkler contractor licensed under Article 2 of Chapter 87 of the General Statutes, or (ii) the performance of internal engineering or survey work by a manufacturing or communications common carrier company, or by a research and development company, or by employees of those corporations provided that the work is in connection with, or incidental to products of, or nonengineering services rendered by those corporations or their affiliates.

The routine maintenance or servicing of machinery, equipment, facilities or structures, the work of mechanics in the performance of their established functions, or the inspection or supervision of construction by a foreman, superintendent, or agent of the architect or professional engineer, or services of an operational nature performed by an employee of a laboratory, a manufacturing plant, a public service corporation, or governmental operation.

The design of land application irrigation systems for an animal waste management plan, required by

G.S. 143-215.10

C, by a designer who exhibits, by at least three years of relevant experience, proficiency in soil science and basic hydraulics, and who is thereby listed as an Irrigation Design Technical Specialist by the North Carolina Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The decommissioning of waste impoundments for animal waste management systems, as defined by

G.S. 143-215.10

B(3), by a person who is designated as a Technical Specialist in the Waste Utilization Plan/Nutrient Management Category by the North Carolina Soil and Water Conservation Commission. This subsection shall not apply to the design or installation of a spillway.

History.

1921, c. 1, s. 13; C.S., s. 6055(o); 1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1995, c. 146, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 742, s. 35; 1997-454, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 23; 2007-536, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 53; 2011-304, s. 7; 2014-120, s. 11(a); 2015-264, s. 47.5(b); 2017-108, s. 16; 2020-18, s. 7(a).

§ 89C-25.1.
Supervision of unlicensed individuals by licensed person.

In all circumstances in which unlicensed individuals are permitted under this Chapter to perform engineering or land surveying work, or both, under the supervision of a licensed engineer, land surveyor, or both, the Board may by regulation establish a reasonable limit on the number of unlicensed individuals which a licensee of the Board may directly or personally supervise at one time.

History.

1979, c. 819, s. 5; 1998-118, s. 24.

§ 89C-25.2.
Program of licensure by discipline.

The Board shall submit to the legislative committees of reference by July 1, 1981, a program of licensure by discipline and an analysis of the costs and merits thereof in order to permit the General Assembly to make a decision on the establishment of such a program. The “committees of reference” shall be the Senate and House Committees on State Government respectively or such other committees as the respective presiding officers may determine.

History.

1979, c. 819, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

§ 89C-26.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-309, s. 10.

§ 89C-27.
Invalid sections; severability.

If any of the provisions of this Chapter, or if any rule, regulation or order thereunder, or if the application of such provision to any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this Chapter and the application of such provision of this Chapter or rule, regulation or order to persons or circumstances, other than those as to which it is held valid, shall not be affected thereby.

History.

1975, c. 681, s. 1.

§ 89C-28.
Existing licensure not affected.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed as affecting the status of licensure of any professional engineer or land surveyor who is rightfully in possession of a certificate of licensure duly issued by the Board and valid as of July 1, 1975.

History.

1951, c. 1084, s. 1; 1959, c. 1236, s. 2; 1975, c. 681, s. 1; 1998-118, s. 25.